Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.030

Holding person hostage—Interference with officer's duties.

Whenever any inmate of a correctional institution shall hold, or participate in holding, any person as a hostage, by force or violence, or the threat thereof, or shall prevent, or participate in preventing an officer of such institution from carrying out his or her duties, by force or violence, or the threat thereof, he or she shall be guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional institution for not less than one year nor more than ten years.

[ 2003 c 53 s 54; 1995 c 314 s 3; 1992 c 7 s 20; 1957 c 112 s 1; 1955 c 241 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Interfering with public officer: Chapter 9A.76 RCW.

Kidnapping: Chapter 9A.40 RCW.